Wyoming, session 2026, SF0085.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Resource Allocation for Victim and Enforcement Needs
(RAVEN) Act."
(b) The legislature finds that:
(i) The internet crimes against children task
force program, through the United States department of
justice, helps state and local law enforcement agencies
develop an effective response to technology-facilitated
child sexual exploitation and internet crimes against
children. The program encompasses forensic and
investigative components, training and technical
assistance, victim assistance and community education. The
program is a national network of sixty-one (61) coordinated
task forces representing over five thousand four hundred
(5,400) federal, state and local law enforcement and
prosecutorial agencies;
(ii) There is a lack of dedicated state
resources to combat internet crimes against children. As a
result, many of the cases involving internet crimes against
children are not adequately investigated. It is the intent
of the legislature to create an account dedicated to
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0085
ENROLLED ACT NO. 55, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
combating internet crimes against children, promoting
education on internet safety to the public and to minors
and rescuing child victims from abuse and exploitation.
Section 2. W.S. 9-1-641 is created to read:
9-1-641. Internet crimes against children task force
program account; definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "ICAC task force" means the internet crimes
against children task force that is located in this state
and recognized by the United States department of justice;
(ii) "Account" means the ICAC task force program
account created by this section.
(b) There is created the ICAC task force program
account to provide a stable funding source for the ICAC
task force in Wyoming. The account shall consist of:
(i) Funds appropriated by the legislature
directly to the account; and
(ii) Grants, gifts and donations accepted by the
attorney general and directed to the account.
(c) All funds in the account are continuously
appropriated to the division of criminal investigation
solely to support the administration and activities of law
enforcement in efforts to combat internet crimes against
children. Unless otherwise specifically provided,
appropriations to the account shall not lapse or revert at
the end of the fiscal period and shall remain in the
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0085
ENROLLED ACT NO. 55, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
account. Interest or other earnings on funds within the
account shall be credited to the account.
Section 3. There is appropriated one million six
hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000.00) from the general
fund to the internet crimes against children task force
program account created by this act. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending
June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose. Notwithstanding W.S.
9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, this appropriation shall
not revert. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the standard budget for the
division of criminal investigation within the attorney
general's office for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.
Section 4. The attorney general shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this act.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0085
ENROLLED ACT NO. 55, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4